Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202079-1132
Special education programs; children less than five years of age; department provide grants.

The department shall provide grants for the costs of the special education programs approved by the department to the school district of residence for children with disabilities who are less than five years of age.

Laws 1978, LB 889, § 3;

Laws 1980, LB 765, § 1;

Laws 1986, LB 942, § 8;

R.S.Supp.,1986, § 43-646.02;

Laws 1987, LB 367, § 25;

Laws 1995, LB 742, § 5;

R.S.Supp.,1995, § 79-3325;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 814;

Laws 1997, LB 346, § 22;

Laws 1998, Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 47;

Laws 2001, LB 797, § 44;

Laws 2019, LB675, § 27.